Utah statutes.
31A-22-630.   Mastectomy coverage.

(1)  If an insured has coverage that provides medical and surgical benefits with respect to a mastectomy, it shall provide coverage, with consultation of the attending physician and the patient, for:

(a)  reconstruction of the breast on which the mastectomy has been performed;

(b)  surgery and reconstruction of the breast on which the mastectomy was not performed to produce symmetrical appearance; and

(c)  prostheses and physical complications with regards to all stages of mastectomy, including lymphedemas.

(2) (a)  This section does not prevent an accident and health insurer from imposing cost-sharing measures for health benefits relating to this coverage, if cost-sharing measures are not greater than those imposed on any other medical condition.

(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (2), cost-sharing measures include imposing a deductible or coinsurance requirement.

(3)  Written notice of the availability of the coverage described in Subsection (1) shall be delivered to the participant:

(a)  upon enrollment; and

(b)  annually after the enrollment.

